Utah statutes.
49-14-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 49-15-201, a public safety service employee
of a participating employer participating in this system is eligible for
service credit in this system at the earliest of:
(a)  July 1, 1969, if the public safety service employee was employed by the
participating employer on July 1, 1969, and the participating employer was
participating in this system on that date;
(b)  the date the participating employer begins participating in this system
if the public safety service employee was employed by the participating
employer on that date; or
(c)  the date the public safety service employee is employed by the
participating employer and is eligible to perform public safety service.
(2) (a) (i)  A participating employer that has public safety service and
firefighter service employees that require cross-training and duty shall
enroll those dual purpose employees in the system in which the greatest amount
of time is actually worked.
(ii)  The employees shall either be full-time public safety service or full-
time firefighter service employees of the participating employer.
(b) (i)  Prior to transferring a dual purpose employee from one system to
another, the participating employer shall receive written permission from the
office.
(ii)  The office may request documentation to verify the appropriateness of
the transfer.
(3)  The board may combine or segregate the actuarial experience of
participating employers in this system for the purpose of setting contribution
rates.
(4) (a) (i)  Each participating employer participating in this system shall
annually submit to the office a schedule indicating the positions to be
covered under this system in accordance with this chapter.
(ii)  The office may require documentation to justify the inclusion of any
position under this system.
(b)  If there is a dispute between the office and a participating employer or
employee over any position to be covered, the disputed position shall be
submitted to the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council established
under Section 53-6-106 for determination.
(c) (i)  The Peace Officer Standards and Training Council’s authority to
decide eligibility for public safety service credit is limited to claims for
coverage under this system for time periods after July 1, 1989.
(ii)  A decision of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council may not
be applied to service credit earned in another system prior to July 1, 1989.
(iii)  Except as provided under Subsection (4)(c)(iv), a decision of the Peace
Officer Standards and Training Council granting a position coverage under this
system may only be applied prospectively from the date of that decision.
(iv)  A decision of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council granting
a position coverage under this system may be applied retroactively only if:
(A)  the participating employer covered other similarly situated positions
under this system during the time period in question; and
(B)  the position otherwise meets all eligibility requirements for receiving
service credit in this system during the period for which service credit is to
be granted.
(5)  The Peace Officer Standards and Training Council may use a subcommittee
to provide a recommendation to the council in determining disputes between the
office and a participating employer or employee over a position to be covered
under this system.
(6)  The Peace Officer Standards and Training Council shall comply with Title
63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in resolving coverage disputes
in this system.
(7)  A public safety employee who is transferred or promoted to an
administration position not covered by this system shall continue to earn
public safety service credit in this system as long as the employee remains
employed in the same department.
(8)  Any employee who is reassigned to the Department of Technology Services
or to the Department of Human Resource Management, and who was a member of
this system, shall be entitled to remain a member of this system.
(9) (a)  To determine that a position is covered under this system, the office
and, if a coverage dispute arises, the Peace Officer Standards and Training
Council shall find that the position requires the employee to:
(i)  place the employee's life or personal safety at risk; and
(ii)  complete training as provided in Section 53-13-103, 53-13-104, or
53-13-105.
(b)  If a position satisfies the requirements of Subsection (9)(a), the office
and the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council shall consider whether or
not the position requires the employee to:
(i)  perform duties that consist primarily of actively preventing or detecting
crime and enforcing criminal statutes or ordinances of this state or any of
its political subdivisions;
(ii)  perform duties that consist primarily of providing community protection;
and
(iii)  respond to situations involving threats to public safety and make
emergency decisions affecting the lives and health of others.
(10)  If a subcommittee is used to recommend the determination of disputes to
the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, the subcommittee shall
comply with the requirements of Subsection (9) in making its recommendation.
(11)  A final order of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council
regarding a dispute is a final agency action for purposes of Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(12)  Except as provided under Subsection (13), if a participating employer's
public safety service employees are not covered by this system or under
Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act, as of January 1,
1998, those public safety service employees who may otherwise qualify for
membership in this system shall, at the discretion of the participating
employer, remain in their current retirement system.
(13) (a)  A public safety service employee employed by an airport police
department, which elects to cover its public safety service employees under
the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System under Subsection (12), may
elect to remain in the public safety service employee's current retirement
system.
(b)  The public safety service employee's election to remain in the current
retirement system under Subsection (13)(a):
(i)  shall be made at the time the employer elects to move its public safety
service employees to a public safety retirement system;
(ii)  documented by written notice to the participating employer; and
(iii)  is irrevocable.
